Maine, session 132, LD1130.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 35-A MRSA §3145, as amended by PL 2023, c. 374, §1, is further amended
to read:
§3145. State energy storage policy goals
The state goal for energy storage system development is at least 300 megawatts of
installed capacity located within the State by December 31, 2025 and at least 400
megawatts of installed capacity located within the State by December 31, 2030. Beginning
January 1, 2024 15, 2027, and every 2 years thereafter, when updating the state energy plan
in accordance with Title 2, section 9, subsection 3, paragraph C, the Governor's Energy
Office established in Title 2, section 9 may shall reevaluate and may increase the state goal
for energy storage system development and shall, in the state energy plan, report that any
increase to the goal to the joint standing committee of the Legislature having jurisdiction
over energy and utilities matters. For the purposes of this section, "energy storage system"
has the same meaning as in section 3481, subsection 6.
Page 1 - 132LR1325(03)